California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(D) If an increase in individual practitioner rates is included in the annual Budget Act, the state-county sharing ratio shall be as established in Section 12306. If the annual Budget Act does not include an increase in individual practitioner rates, a county may use county-only funds to meet federal financial participation requirements consistent with federal law.

(3) (A) By November 1, 1993, the department
 shall submit a state plan amendment to the federal Health Care Financing Administration to implement this subdivision. To the extent that any element or requirement of this subdivision is not approved, the department shall submit a request to the federal Health Care Financing Administration for any waivers as would be necessary to implement this subdivision.

(B) The provider reimbursement ratesetting methodology authorized by the amendments to this subdivision in the 1993–94 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be operative until all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(k) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall, by September 1, 1993, notify the following persons that they are eligible to participate in the personal care services program:

(A) Persons eligible for
 services pursuant to the Pickle Amendment, as adopted October 28, 1976.

(B) Persons eligible for services pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 1383c of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The State Department of Social Services shall, by September 1, 1993, notify persons to whom paragraph (1) applies and who receive advance payment for in-home supportive services that they will qualify for services under this section without a spend down of excess income if they elect to accept payment for services on an arrears rather than an advance payment basis.

(l) An individual who is eligible for services subject
 to the maximum amount specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4 shall be given the option of hiring their own provider.

(m) The county welfare department shall inform in writing any individual who is potentially eligible for services under this section of their right to the services.

(n) It is the intent of the Legislature that this entire section be an inseparable whole and that no part of it be severable. If any portion of this section is found to be invalid, as determined
 by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, this section shall become inoperative.

(o) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) shall be implemented so as to conform to federal law authorizing their implementation.

(p) (1) Personal care services shall be provided as a covered benefit to a medically needy aged, blind, or disabled person, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14051, to the same extent and under the same requirements as they are provided under subdivision (a) of this section to a categorically needy, aged, blind, or disabled person, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14050.1, and to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(2) The department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment necessary to include personal care services
 described in paragraph (1) as a Medicaid service pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 440.170 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) In the event that the Department of Finance determines that expenditures of both General Fund moneys for personal care services provided under this subdivision to medically needy aged, blind, or disabled persons together with expenditures of both General Fund moneys and federal funds received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for all aged, blind, and disabled persons receiving in-home supportive services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, in the 2000–01 fiscal year or in any subsequent fiscal year, are expected to exceed the General Fund appropriation and the federal appropriation received under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act for expenditures for all aged, blind, and disabled persons receiving in-home supportive services provided in the
 1999–2000 fiscal year pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, as it read on June 30, 1998, as adjusted for caseload growth or as changed in the Budget Act or by statute or regulation, then this subdivision shall cease to be operative on the first day of the month that begins after the expiration of a period of 30 days subsequent to a notification in writing by the Director of the Department of Finance to the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(4) Solely for purposes of paragraph (3), caseload growth means an adjustment factor determined by the department based on:

(A) Growth in the number of persons eligible for benefits under Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 12000) on the basis of their disability.

(B) The average increase in the number of hours in the program established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 in the 1994–95 to 1998–99 fiscal years, inclusive, due to the level of impairment.

(C) Any increase in program cost that is required by an increase in hourly costs pursuant to the Budget Act or statute.

(5) In the event of a final judicial determination by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the Administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that personal care services must be provided to any medically needy person who is not aged, blind, or disabled, then this subdivision shall cease to be operative on the first day of the first month that begins after the
 expiration of a period of 30 days subsequent to a notification in writing by the Director of Finance to the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(6) If this subdivision ceases to be operative, all aged, blind, and disabled persons who would have been eligible to receive services under this section shall be immediately eligible for services under the IHSS Plus waiver authorized pursuant to Section 14132.951, if otherwise eligible, upon this section becoming inoperative. If this section becomes inoperative and a person is ineligible for the IHSS Plus waiver, then eligibility shall be determined under the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter
 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 146.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.951.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Health Services seek approval of a Medicaid waiver under the federal Social Security Act in order that the services available under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, known as the In-Home Supportive Services program, may be provided as a Medi-Cal benefit under this chapter, to the extent federal financial participation is available. The waiver shall be known as the “IHSS Plus waiver.”

(b) To the extent feasible, the IHSS Plus waiver described in subdivision (a) shall incorporate the eligibility requirements, benefits, and operational requirements of the In-Home Supportive Services program. The director shall have discretion to modify eligibility requirements, benefits, and operational requirements as needed to secure approval of the Medicaid waiver.

(c) Upon implementation of the IHSS Plus waiver, and to the extent federal financial participation is available, the services available through the In-Home Supportive Services program shall be furnished as benefits of the Medi-Cal program through the IHSS Plus waiver to persons who meet the eligibility requirements of the IHSS Plus waiver. The benefits shall be limited by the terms and conditions of the IHSS Plus waiver and by the availability of federal financial participation.

(d) Upon implementation
 of the IHSS Plus waiver:

(1) A person who is eligible for the IHSS Plus waiver shall no longer be eligible to receive services under the In-Home Supportive Services program to the extent those services are available through the IHSS Plus waiver.

(2) A person shall not be eligible to receive services pursuant to the IHSS Plus waiver to the extent those services are available pursuant to Section 14132.95.

(e) Services provided pursuant to this section shall be rendered, under the administrative direction of the State Department of Social Services, in the manner authorized in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, for the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(f) Services shall not be provided to residents of facilities licensed by the
 department, and shall not be provided to residents of a community care facility or a residential care facility for the elderly licensed by the State Department of Social Services.

(g) To the extent permitted by federal law, reimbursement rates for services shall be equal to the rates in each county for the same mode of services in the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement the provisions of this section through all-county welfare director letters or similar publications. Actions taken to implement, interpret, or make specific this section shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act or to the
 review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. Upon request of the department, the Office of Administrative Law shall publish the regulations in the California Code of Regulations. All county welfare director letters or similar publications authorized pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for no more than 18 months.

(2) The department may also adopt emergency regulations implementing the provisions of this section. The adoption of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. Any emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 18 months by which time
 final regulations shall be adopted. The department shall seek input from the entities listed in Section 12305.72 when developing the regulations, all county welfare director letters, or similar publications.

(i) In the event of a conflict between the terms of the IHSS Plus waiver and any provision of this part or any regulation, all-county welfare directors letters or similar publications adopted for the purpose of implementing this part, the terms of the waiver shall control to the extent that the services are covered by the waiver. If the department determines that a conflict exists, the department shall issue updated instructions to counties for the purposes of implementing necessary program changes. The department shall post a copy of, or a link to, the instructions on its Web site.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or any other provision of this
 section, the department shall not waive or modify the provisions of Section 12301.2, 12301.6, 12302.25, 12306.1, or 12309.

(2) Upon receipt of the IHSS Plus waiver, the director shall report to the Legislature on any modifications in benefits or eligibility and operational requirements of the In-Home Supportive Services program required for receipt of the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 45.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.952.

(a) The department shall seek approval of an amendment to the Medicaid state plan pursuant to Section 1396n(j) of Title 42 of the United States Code to provide self-directed personal assistance services under the state plan in order that the services available under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3, known as the In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program, may be provided as a Medi-Cal benefit under this chapter, to the extent that federal financial participation is available. This program shall be known as the “IHSS
 Plus option.”

(b) To the extent feasible, the IHSS Plus option shall incorporate the eligibility requirements, benefits, and operational requirements of the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3. The director shall have the discretion to modify these eligibility requirements, benefits, and operational requirements to the extent necessary to secure federal approval of the Medicaid state plan amendment.

(c) The services available through the IHSS Plus waiver pursuant to Section 14132.951 shall be furnished as benefits under the IHSS Plus option to the extent that federal financial participation is available to persons who meet the eligibility requirements of the IHSS Plus option. Upon implementation of the IHSS Plus option, a person who is eligible for services under the IHSS Plus option shall no longer be eligible to
 receive services under Section 14132.951.

(d) Upon implementation of the IHSS Plus option:

(1) A person who is eligible for the IHSS Plus option shall not be eligible to receive services under the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 to the extent those services are available through the IHSS Plus option.

(2) A person shall not be eligible to receive services pursuant to the IHSS Plus option to the extent those services are available pursuant to Section 14132.95.

(e) Services provided pursuant to this section shall be rendered, under the administrative direction of the State Department of Social Services, in the manner authorized in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3,
 for the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(f) Services shall not be provided to residents of facilities licensed by the State Department of Public Health, and shall not be provided to residents of a community care facility or a residential care facility for the elderly licensed by the State Department of Social Services.

(g) To the extent permitted by federal law, reimbursement rates for services under the IHSS Plus option shall be equal to the rates in each county for the same mode of services in the In-Home Supportive Services program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) the department may implement
 the provisions of this section through all-county welfare director letters or similar publications. Actions taken to implement, interpret, or make specific this section shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act or to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. Upon request of the department, the Office of Administrative Law shall publish the regulations in the California Code of Regulations. All county welfare director letters or similar publications authorized pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for no more than 18 months.

(2) The department may also adopt emergency regulations implementing the provisions of this section. The adoption of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review and approval by
 the Office of Administrative Law. Any emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 18 months by which time final regulations shall be adopted. The department shall seek input from the entities listed in Section 12305.72 when developing the regulations, all-county welfare director letters, or similar publications.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or any other provision of this section, the department shall not waive or modify the provisions of Section 12301.2, 12301.6, 12302.25, 12306.1, or 12309.

(2) Upon the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ approval of the Medicaid state plan amendment known as the “IHSS Plus option,” the director shall notify the Legislature of any modifications in benefits
 or eligibility and operational requirements of the In-Home Supportive Services program required for that Medicaid state plan amendment to become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 46.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.955.

Personal care services that are provided pursuant to Section 14132.95 shall include services in the recipient’s place of employment if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The personal care services are limited to those that are currently authorized for the recipient in the recipient’s home and those services are to be utilized by the recipient at the recipient’s place of employment to enable the recipient to obtain, retain, or return to, work. Authorized services utilized by the
 recipient at the recipient’s place of employment shall be services that are relevant and necessary in supporting and maintaining employment. However, work place services shall not be used to supplant any reasonable accommodations required of an employer by the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) or other legal entitlements or third-party obligations.

(b) The provision of personal care services at the recipient’s place of employment shall be authorized only to the extent that the total hours utilized at the work place are within the total personal care services hours authorized for the recipient in the home. Additional personal care services hours may not be authorized in connection with a recipient’s employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.956.

(a) The department shall assess and determine whether it would be cost efficient for the state to exercise the option made available under Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)). When performing this assessment, the department shall collaborate and consult with the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Developmental Services, the California Department of Aging, and any other state agency that the
 department believes can assist in its determination whether it would be cost efficient for the state to exercise this option. If the department determines that it would be cost efficient for the state to exercise the federal option, it shall seek a Medi-Cal State Plan amendment to provide home- and community-based attendant services and supports that include assistance with activities of daily living (ADLs), instrumental activities of daily living (IADLs), and health-related tasks pursuant to Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)).

(b) If the department determines that it would be cost efficient to exercise the option made available under Section 1915(k) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(k)), the department shall establish a development and implementation council that shall include, as a majority of its members, persons with disabilities and elderly individuals, and their
 representatives. The department shall consult and collaborate with the council when developing and implementing a Medi-Cal State Plan amendment to exercise this option.

(c) Services and supports pursuant to this section may be rendered under the administrative direction of other state departments in accordance with the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment and subject to the department’s authority as the designated single state agency for the administration or supervision of the administration of the Medi-Cal program.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) the department, and any other state department pursuant to subdivision (c), may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director, until regulations are
 adopted.

(2) The department, and any other state department rendering services and supports pursuant to subdivision (c), shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section within 24 months from the date federal approval pursuant to this section is received. The adoption of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review and approval by the Office of Administrative Law. Any emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 18 months by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 36.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.96.

Medi-Cal personal care services provider rates established as provided in the state plan under Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, by an in-home supportive services public authority established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 12301.6 shall be reviewed by the county in which the in-home supportive services public authority operates, to determine that the rates are consistent with the county budget and that the county will be able to fund any
 increase in its share of costs, prior to the submission of the rates to the department. Certification of the county’s ability to fund any increase in rates shall accompany the submission of rates to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 307, Sec. 17.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.966.

(a) Services provided by a physician assistant are a covered benefit under this chapter to the extent authorized by federal law and subject to utilization controls.

(b) Subject to subdivision (a), all services performed by a physician assistant within his or her scope of practice that would be a covered benefit if performed by a physician and surgeon shall be a covered benefit under this chapter.

(c) The
 department shall not impose chart review, countersignature, or other conditions of coverage or payment on a physician and surgeon supervising physician assistants that are more stringent than requirements imposed by Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or regulations of the Medical Board of California promulgated under that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 376, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.968.

(a) (1) Pharmacist services are a benefit under the Medi-Cal program, subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(2) The department shall establish a fee schedule for the list of pharmacist services.

(3) The rate of reimbursement for pharmacist services shall be at 85 percent of the fee schedule for physician services under the Medi-Cal program, except for medication therapy management (MTM) pharmacist services as described in Section 14132.969.

(b) (1) The following services are covered pharmacist services that may be provided to a Medi-Cal
 beneficiary:

(A) Furnishing travel medications, as authorized in clause (3) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 4052 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) Furnishing naloxone hydrochloride, as authorized in Section 4052.01 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) Furnishing self-administered hormonal contraception, as authorized in subdivision (a) of Section 4052.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) Initiating and administering immunizations, as authorized in Section 4052.8 of the Business and Professions Code.

(E) Providing tobacco cessation counseling and furnishing nicotine replacement therapy, as authorized in Section 4052.9 of the Business
 and Professions Code.

(F) Initiating and furnishing preexposure prophylaxis, as authorized in Section 4052.02 of the Business and Professions Code.

(G) Initiating and furnishing postexposure prophylaxis, as authorized in Section 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code.

(H) Providing MTM pharmacist services in conjunction with the dispensing of qualified specialty drugs, as described in Section 14132.969.

(2) Covered pharmacist services shall be subject to department protocols and utilization controls.

(c) A pharmacist shall be enrolled as an ordering, referring, and prescribing provider under the Medi-Cal program prior to rendering a pharmacist service that is submitted by a Medi-Cal
 pharmacy provider for reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section. This section shall not be implemented until the necessary federal approvals are obtained and shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(2) This section neither restricts nor prohibits any services currently provided by pharmacists as authorized by law, including, but not limited to, this chapter, or the Medicaid state plan.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments, by means of
 all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. By July 1, 2021, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Commencing July 1, 2017, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   (SB 339)   Effective February 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.969.

(a) Subject to an annual appropriation for this express purpose, the department shall implement a medication therapy management (MTM) reimbursement methodology for covered pharmacist services related to the dispensing of qualified specialty drugs by an eligible pharmacy contracted with the department pursuant to subdivision (c). MTM reimbursement pursuant to this section is intended to supplement Medi-Cal payments made to eligible pharmacies for MTM pharmacist services provided in conjunction with certain specialty drug therapy categories, as identified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(b) In implementing this section, the
 department shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish and maintain protocols and utilization controls for covered MTM pharmacist services.

(2) Establish and maintain a list of covered specialty drug therapy categories for which MTM pharmacist services reimbursement is available.

(3) Establish and maintain rates of reimbursement for covered MTM pharmacist services under contracts with participating pharmacies pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) Establish and maintain the eligibility criteria and conditions for receipt of MTM pharmacist services reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) MTM pharmacist services reimbursement pursuant to this section shall only be available to a Medi-Cal enrolled pharmacy that enters into an MTM pharmacist services contract with the department.

(2) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(d) (1) This section shall apply to dates of service on or after July 1, 2021, or to dates of service on or after the effective date reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever is later.

(2) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section.

(3) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) This section neither restricts nor prohibits any services currently provided by pharmacists as authorized by law, including, but not limited to, this chapter, or the
 Medicaid state plan.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other
 similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medication therapy management” or “MTM” means a distinct service or group of services, as determined by the department, that are provided by pharmacists to improve health outcomes of beneficiaries who are at risk of treatment failure due to noncompliance, nonadherence, or other factors found to negatively affect drug therapy outcomes.

(2) “Specialty drugs” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.45.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 395.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.97.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “waiver personal care services” means personal care services authorized by the department for persons who are eligible for either nursing or model nursing facility waiver services.

(2) Waiver personal care services shall satisfy all of the following criteria:

(A) The services shall be defined in the nursing and model nursing facility waivers.

(B) The services shall differ in scope from services that may be authorized under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952.

(C) The services shall not replace any hours of services
 authorized or that may be authorized under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952.

(b) An individual may receive waiver personal care services if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The individual has been approved by the department to receive services in accordance with a waiver approved under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)) for persons who would otherwise require care in a nursing facility.

(2) The individual has doctor’s orders that specify that he or she requires waiver personal care services in order to remain in his or her own home.

(3) The individual chooses, either personally or through a substitute decisionmaker who is recognized under state law for purposes of giving consent for medical treatment,
 to receive waiver personal care services, as well as medically necessary skilled nursing services, in order to remain in his or her own home.

(4) The waiver personal care services and all other waiver services for the individual do not result in costs that exceed the fiscal limit established under the waiver.

(c) The department shall notify the administrator of the In-Home Supportive Services program in the county of residence of any individual who meets all requirements of subdivision (b) and has been authorized by the department to receive waiver personal care services. The county of residence shall then do the following:

(1) Inform the department of the services that the individual is authorized to receive under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952 at the time he or she becomes eligible for waiver personal care
 services.

(2) Determine the individual’s eligibility for services under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952 if he or she is not currently authorized to receive those services and if he or she has not been previously determined eligible for those services.

(3) Implement the department’s authorization for waiver personal care services for the individual at the quantity and scope authorized by the department.

(d) (1) Waiver personal care services approved by the department for individuals who meet the requirements of subdivision (b) may be provided in either of the following ways, or a combination of both:

(A) By a licensed and certified home health agency participating in the Medi-Cal program.

(B) By one or more providers of personal care services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 and subdivision (d) of Section 14132.95, when the individual elects, in writing, to utilize these service providers.

(2) The department shall approve waiver personal care services for individuals who meet the requirements of subdivision (b) only when the department finds that the individual’s receipt of waiver personal care services is necessary in order to enable the individual to be maintained safely in his or her own home and community.

(3) When waiver personal care services are provided by a licensed and certified home health agency, the home health agency shall receive payment in the manner by which it would receive payment for any other service approved by the department.

(4) (A) When waiver personal care services are provided by one or more providers of personal care services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 and subdivision (d) of Section 14132.95, the providers shall receive payment on a schedule and in a manner by which providers of personal care services receive payment. The State Department of Social Services shall commence making payments for waiver personal care services when its payment system has been modified to accommodate those payments. A county is not obligated to administer waiver personal care services until the State Department of Social Services payment system has been modified to accommodate those payments. However, any county or public authority or nonprofit consortium that administers the In-Home Supportive Services and personal care services programs may pay providers for the delivery of waiver personal care services if it chooses to do so.
 In that case, the county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium shall be reimbursed by the department for the waiver personal care services authorized by the department and provided to an individual upon submittal of documentation as required by the waiver, and in accordance with the requirements of the department.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A) and to the extent the department obtains any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this subparagraph, “payment” includes wages and benefits. Payments provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be available for service dates on or after the effective date specified in the applicable federal approval obtained by the department and only after the Case Management Information and Payroll System (CMIPS) system has been modified to accommodate these payments, or on July 1, 2019, whichever is sooner.

(e) Waiver personal care
 services shall not be included as alternative resources in a county’s determination of the amount of services an individual may receive under Section 14132.95 or 14132.952.

(f) Any administrative costs to the State Department of Social Services, a county, or a public authority or nonprofit consortium associated with implementing this section shall be considered administrative costs under the waiver and shall be reimbursed by the department.

(g) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Social Services for the 1998–99 fiscal year for the purpose of making changes to the case management, information, and payrolling system that are necessary for the implementation of this section.

(h) This section shall not be implemented until the department has
 obtained federal approval of any necessary amendments to the existing nursing facility and model nursing facility waivers and the state plan under Title 19 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.). Any amendments to the existing nursing facility and model nursing facility waivers and the state plan which are deemed to be necessary by the director shall be submitted to the federal Health Care Financing Administration by April 1, 1999.

(i) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that its implementation results in fiscal neutrality, as required under the terms of the waivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 33.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.971.

(a) The county, or the public authority or nonprofit consortium established pursuant to Section 12301.6, shall be deemed to be the employer to meet and confer in good faith, in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, regarding wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment of individuals providing waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97. For purposes of this section, bargaining unit placement pursuant to Section 3507.1 of the Government Code, and waiver personal care services, individuals providing waiver personal care services shall be deemed a part of the established bargaining unit of in-home supportive services providers of an employer of record described in Section 12301.6 in the county in which the
 individual delivers waiver personal care services.

(b) Recipients shall retain the right to hire, fire, and supervise the work of any waiver personal care services personnel providing services to them.

(c) For service dates on or after the effective date specified in the applicable federal approval obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (e), wages, benefits, and all other terms and conditions of employment for individuals providing waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 shall be equal to the wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment in the respective county for the individual provider mode of services in the In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3.

(d) If eligibility for benefits requires a